Hawaii statutes.
§171-91 Notice of availability of leases;
selection of lessees. Notice of availability of land to be offered to
qualified applicants for lease shall be by publication in accordance with the
same procedure as set forth in section 171-16(b), but limited to the county in
which the land is situated. The notice shall contain, in addition to such
other information as the board of land and natural resources deems proper, a
reference to the qualification of applicants, a brief description of the land
to be leased, its locality, area, and quality, with reference to the survey,
and the date by which the applications must be filed for a lease of the land.
The board shall, as soon as practicable following the closing date for
applications, review the qualifications of the applicants, determine their
respective needs, fix the terms, covenants, and conditions of leases to be
issued, as more particularly provided in section 171-87, and, within the limits
of availability of the land for which notice has been published, issue leases
to selected applicants. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-86; HRS §171-91]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next